New Jersey, session 221, A3857.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 10 of P.L.2017, c.341 (C.45:15BB-11.1) is amended to read as follows: competence 10.  a.  The State Board of Social Work Examiners shall require that the number of credits of continuing education required of each person licensed or certified by the board as a condition of renewal include at least one credit of educational programs or topics concerning prescription opioid drugs, including the risks and signs of opioid abuse, addiction, and diversion. b.    (1)  Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, each person licensed or certified by the board shall earn four credits of continuing education by volunteering as a poll worker on the day of a State primary or a general election day.  A person may volunteer for either a primary or a general election, or both, and shall receive two credits for each time the person served as a volunteer, as appropriate.  A person licensed or certified by the board shall not earn more than four credits per renewal period for volunteering as a poll worker. (2)   For purposes of recordkeeping, a person shall maintain proof of the time as a poll worker as follows: (a)   with a certified letter issued by the municipality, county or other local government charged with managing an election; or (b)   in another manner and form as determined by the board. c.     Nothing under this section shall be construed as requiring a person to volunteer as a poll worker, and the credits provided for volunteer work shall be offered as an option for a person to fulfill continuing education requirements that are required pursuant to section 10 of P.L.2017, c.341. d.    As used in this section, day of a State primary means the day New Jersey holds a primary for State or federal elections. Election day means the day New Jersey holds a State or federal general election. (cf: P.L.2017, c.341, s.10) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to licensure and certification renewal issued on or after the date of enactment.